idioms/sutsilvan-override.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Frequent words with different forms in Sutsilvan
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Art +Def +Indef ^| ^| +Prep
+Pron +Pers +Refl +Poss +Dem +Interrog
^DB +Noun +Nom +AccDat +Acc
+Masc +Fem +MF +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl
+Apo +Ton +Aton +Conj +Subj +Verb +PresInd
@U.FLEX.MSg@ @U.FLEX.FSg@ @U.FLEX.MPl@ @U.FLEX.FPl@

LEXICON Root
DEFINITE ;
INDEFINITEA ;
DEFINITEWITHPREP ;
PERSONAL ;
REFLEXIVE ;
POSSESSIVE ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
OTHERFORMS ;

! articles
LEXICON DEFINITE
il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:igl	#;
il+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:igls	#;


LEXICON INDEFINITEA
in+Art+Indef+Masc+Sg:egn	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg:egna	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg+Apo:egn'	#;


LEXICON DEFINITEWITHPREP
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agli	#;
! a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:i'ls	#; ! form?

a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:digl	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:digls	#;

en+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agl	#;
en+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agls	#;

! pronouns
LEXICON PERSONAL
! jau
jau+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:jou	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mei	#;
! ti
ti+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Sg:tei	#;
ti+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Sg:tei	#;



LEXICON REFLEXIVE
! jau
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mei	#;
! ti
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+2P+Sg:tei	#;
! el, ella
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+Sg:sei	#;
! els, ellas
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+MF+Pl:sei	#;




LEXICON POSSESSIVE
! jau
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:mieus	#;
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:mieus	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:mieus	#;
! ti
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:tieus	#;
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:tieus	#;
tes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:tieus	#;
! el, ella
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:sieus	#;
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:sieus	#;
ses+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:sieus	#;



LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
quai+Pron+Dem:quegl	#;



!! Endings:
LEXICON REGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON REGULARSINGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;

LEXICON REGULARPLURAL
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON OTHERFORMS
! verbs
esser+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:e	#;
avair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:â	#;

! prepositions
en+Prep:an	#;
per+Prep:par	#;
sin+Prep:sen	#;

! con- and subjunctions
tge+Subj:ca	#;
